California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(c) Fees and penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund. Funds received by the department from fees and penalties pursuant to this section shall be used exclusively to carry out the intent and purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, pharmacological studies, drug testing, and drug research, inspection for drugs, prosecution of alleged offenders, administrative costs, attorney’s and expert witness fees, and any other costs necessary to carry out this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 60.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24013.

(a) The secretary shall adopt those reasonable rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out this chapter.

(b) The secretary shall adopt an exempt medications list that identifies all exempt medications. All changes to the list shall take effect on January 1 of the following year. At the time an event is registered pursuant to Section 24015, a copy of the exempt medications list shall be provided to the event manager for reference purposes. The exempt medications list shall also be made available to any person upon request.

(c) In making and adopting regulations, the secretary shall first consult with the advisory committee appointed pursuant to Section 24013.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 434, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

24013.5.

(a) The secretary shall appoint an advisory committee to serve without compensation. The committee shall meet at least once a year, however, the chairperson may call for additional meetings as the chairperson determines are necessary. The committee shall elect a chairperson at its first meeting after appointment. Thereafter selection of the chairperson shall take place as deemed appropriate by, and at the pleasure of, the committee.

(b) (1) Members of the committee and their alternates may include, but not be limited to, representation from the California State Horsemen’s Association, the Equestrian Trails, Inc., the California Professional Horsemen’s Association, the Los Angeles Hunter Jumper
 Association, the California Dressage Society, the Pacific Coast Quarter Horse Association, the Central California Quarter Horse Association, the department, the North American Trail Ride Conference, the United States Equestrian Federation, the University of California School of Veterinary Medicine, the Appaloosa Horse Club, the Arabian Horse Association, the Pinto Horse Association of America, the California Veterinary Medical Association, the NorCal Hunter Jumper Association, the California Farm Bureau Federation, the California Gymkhana Association, the American Morgan Horse Association, the Pacific Coast Cutting Horse Association, the Pacific Coast Horse Shows Association, and any other organization the secretary deems appropriate.

(2) The advisory committee members and their alternates shall be representative of the industry that this chapter regulates. The members of the committee may also include, but are not limited to, representatives
 of breed associations represented within the state and other organizations with an interest in the deterrence of drug abuse in the industry that this chapter regulates.

(c) (1) In addition, the secretary may appoint one public member to the committee.

(2) Upon the secretary’s request, the committee shall submit to the secretary the names of three or more natural persons, each of whom shall be a citizen and resident of this state for appointment by the secretary as a public member and an alternate public member of the committee. The secretary may appoint one of the nominees as the public member on the committee. If all nominees are unsatisfactory to the secretary, the committee shall continue to submit lists of nominees until the secretary has made a selection. Any vacancy in the office of the public member of the committee shall be filled by appointment by
 the secretary from the nominee or nominees similarly qualified and submitted by the committee. The public member of the committee shall represent the interests of the general public in all matters considered by the committee and shall have the same voting and other rights and immunities as other members of the committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 72.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24014.

It is the intent of the Legislature that each of the persons appointed to the advisory committee pursuant to Section 24013.5 represent and further the interests of the industry that person is selected to represent, and that this representation and furtherance serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to each person who is appointed to the committee, the industry represented is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

24015.

(a) Every event shall be registered with the department, unless otherwise prescribed by the secretary by regulation. The event manager of an event shall file a completed registration form with the department, as prescribed by the secretary, at least 60 days before the beginning of the event, which shall constitute the registration of the event.

(b) An event manager who fails to register an event required to be registered pursuant to this chapter is subject to a civil penalty to be levied by the secretary in an amount not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). In determining the amount of the penalty, the secretary shall consider any previous violations, and whether the
 event manager cooperated in good faith with the department.

(c) In addition to the civil penalty specified in subdivision (b), the secretary may, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, suspend the event manager from hosting or managing a public equine event for a period of not less than 90 days or more than one year for each violation. It is unlawful for an event manager suspended from hosting or managing a public equine event by the secretary to conduct a public equine event during the period of suspension. An event manager suspended by the secretary from hosting or managing a public equine event, who hosts or manages a public equine event during the period of suspension, is subject to the civil penalty prescribed by subdivision (b) for each public equine event held during the period of suspension.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 116, Sec. 13.   (AB 1388)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

24016.

No provision contained in this chapter shall in any way affect existing statutes governing horseracing or affect horse sales or horse auction sales when such sales are solely for the sale of racehorses or breeding stock that is used in the production of racehorses and when such sales are held or conducted on the premises of any racing association under the jurisdiction of, and with the authorization and approval of, the California Horse Racing Board.

“Racehorse” as used in this section means each live horse, including a stallion, mare, gelding, ridgeling, colt, or filly, that is eligible to participate in a horseracing contest in California wherein parimutuel racing is permitted under rules and regulations prescribed by the California Horse Racing Board. The exemption provided in this section shall not apply with respect to racehorses participating in a competition, show, or sale covered by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1033.)
-------------------------------------------

24017.

This chapter shall not apply to any horse one year of age or less entered in any public horse sale, if public notice of the administering of any drug or medication has been given as prescribed by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 434, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

24018.

The secretary may accept on behalf of the state, donations of money from any person, association, or agency interested in the control of drugging of horses. Any fines, penalties, fees, or donations collected by the secretary under this chapter shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund. Any interest earned from the investment of moneys derived pursuant to this chapter shall also be deposited in the fund. These moneys shall be used by the department to carry out this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 227, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Equine Protection: Enforcement [24101. - 24134.]

24101.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Equine Protection Act of 1991.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24102.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Animal” means a horse, pony, mule, or burro. 

(b) “Program” means the program of equine protection and identification of the department. 

(c) “Slaughter” means to kill an animal and prepare it for consumption by animals or human beings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24103.

There is in the department a program of equine protection and identification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24104.

Each sheriff or other officer to whom a complaint that relates to the loss or theft of any animal is made shall, in a timely manner, transmit to the Bureau of Livestock Identification a report that contains all of the following:

(a) A complete description of each animal lost or stolen including approximate age, height, and weight, sex, breed, color, natural marks, scars, a description of each brand or tattoo and its location on the animal, and any other information that may be of use in identifying, locating and receiving the lost or stolen animal.

(b) The county or city where the loss or theft occurred.

(c) The approximate date and time of the loss or theft.

(d) The law enforcement agency’s report identification or number.

(e) The name, address, and telephone number of the law enforcement agency that completed the report.

(f) The name of that law enforcement agency’s investigating officer to be contacted relating to the loss or theft.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 431, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

24104.5.

The Bureau of Livestock Identification shall compile a report on information received pursuant to Section 24104. The bureau shall distribute the report to all county sheriffs’ departments in a timely manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 431, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

24105.

No investigator of the program or any other employee of the department, in enforcing this chapter, shall be required to conduct any investigation that involves the theft of any animal. That investigation shall be conducted by the law enforcement entity that filed the theft report. However, an investigator of the program may assist the law enforcement entity that filed the theft report in the theft investigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 459, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24106.

(a) Before an animal may be sold at an auction, the operator of the auction yard shall determine whether the animal has an implanted microchip or has been tattooed or branded with an identifying mark. If the
 animal has an implanted microchip, a tattoo, or a brand, the operator of the auction yard shall post, on its internet website and through any active social media in which the operator of the auction yard participates, all identifying information, including any identification number contained in the microchip and a detailed description or picture of any tattoo or brand found on the animal. This information shall remain on the auction yard operator’s internet website
 and on the page of any active social media in which the operator of the auction yard participates for at least 24 hours after the initial posting.

(b) No person shall purchase, consign, sell, or accept the donation of an animal at a public or private auction unless the seller or donor of the animal provides, and the purchaser or donee receives, at the time of delivery, a written bill of sale or any written instrument that contains all of the following information:

(1) A description of each animal that is sold that includes its sex, breed, color, approximate height and weight, approximate age, natural marks, or identifying scars, and of each brand or tattoo and its location. If the animal has been branded or tattooed and registered with the Bureau
 of Livestock Identification in the
 department, the identification papers shall accompany the animal.

(2) The name, address, signature, and motor vehicle driver’s license number of the person who sold or donated the animal.

(3) The date of the transaction.

(4) The name, address, and motor vehicle driver’s license number of the purchaser of the animal.

(5) The name, address, and motor vehicle driver’s license number of any person who transports the animal to the purchaser or an auction yard.

(c) Any person who purchases
 an animal at an auction described in subdivision (b) shall sign a sworn statement, under penalty of perjury, acknowledging and agreeing to comply with Sections 598c and 598d of the Penal Code.

(d) For a minimum of one year following the date of sale of each animal sold at auction, the operator of the auction yard shall maintain appropriate records that accurately document compliance with this section. The operator of the auction yard shall provide access to the records and documents identified in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) upon the request of the department, a law enforcement officer, an animal control agency, or a humane
 officer appointed pursuant to Section 14502 of the Corporations Code. 

(e) In addition to any other penalties available under law, a person who violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the first offense and two thousand dollars ($2,000) for the second and each subsequent
 offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 765, Sec. 3.   (AB 128)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

24107.

Every operator of an auction yard or dealer who handles animals destined for slaughter shall keep a written record of all sales and purchases made in the course of conducting the business for at least two years after making the final entry of any purchase, sale, or donation of an animal. The operator of an auction yard or the dealer shall show the record on demand to any investigator of the program or any peace officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24108.

Any person who does not keep the written records required by this chapter or who refuses, upon demand of any investigator of the program or any peace officer, to show the record, to allow copies to be made of the record, or who destroys the record within two years after making the final entry of any purchase, consignment, sale, or donation of any animal, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 217, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24109.

(a) No animal, whether branded or not, shall be shipped, transported, hauled, or delivered for slaughter, unless it is inspected by an inspector of the program. 

(b) As part of the inspection required by this section, the inspector shall be provided a valid bill of sale containing the information designated in Section 24106 for each individual animal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24110.

An inspector shall seize any animal for which a valid bill of sale containing the information designated in Section 24106 is not provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24111.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to remove from the possession of an inspector any animal seized or which is otherwise in the possession of an inspector.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24112.

If the animal which is seized or otherwise in the possession of the inspector is branded, the director shall cause a search to be made of the brand records to ascertain the owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24113.

If the brands or marks are recorded, the director shall immediately, by letter, notify the person in whose name the brands or marks are recorded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24114.

If the owner cannot be ascertained, the director shall cause a notice of the seizure of the animal to remain posted for a period of 14 days on a bulletin board in each office of the Bureau of Livestock Identification. In addition to posting the notice, the director shall periodically publish a list of the descriptions of the animals, containing the information specified in Section 24106, in the classified section of a horse-oriented publication which is in general circulation throughout the State of California. The notices shall also state the time and place of the animal’s proposed sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24115.

Any person that claims ownership of the animal may, at any time, but not later than 14 days after the first posting of the notice, file his or her proof of ownership with the director and the director shall proceed to determine the claim of ownership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24116.

If ownership is proved to the satisfaction of the director, the animal shall be returned to the owner upon payment by the owner of all expenses which were incurred in the handling of the animal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24117.

If the animal at any time while in the possession of an inspector is in a condition which requires immediate disposal, the animal may be disposed of by the director. The proceeds from the salvage, if any, in excess of expenses which were incurred in the handling of the animal shall be paid to the person proving ownership pursuant to Section 24116.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24118.

If after 14 days from the date of the first posting of notice, no satisfactory proof of ownership of the animal has been made, or if the owner fails or refuses to pay all expenses which were incurred, the director shall sell the animal. All sales which are made pursuant to this chapter convey a good and valid title to the purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24119.

The proceeds from the sale of any animal shall be paid into, and the expenses of holding, advertising, sale, and other incidental expenses shall be paid from, the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24120.

If any person shall, within one year after the date of the sale, prove to the satisfaction of the director his or her ownership of an animal which was sold pursuant to this article, the director shall order the net proceeds of the sale of the animal to be paid to that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24121.

If the inspector of the program determines that the person who offers the animal for inspection is in lawful possession, the inspector shall issue a certificate of inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24122.

The certificate of inspection shall be signed by the inspector of the program and shall indicate all of the following:

(a) The place and date of inspection and the number of animals inspected. 

(b) The sex, breed, color, approximate height and weight, approximate age, natural marks and identifying scars, and a description of each brand or tattoo and its location on each animal. 

(c) If the animal is to be transported, the names of the shipper and consignee and the point of origin and the final destination of the shipment. 

(d) If the animal is to be transported, the length of time necessary to transport the animal between the point of inspection and the point of final destination. The inspector shall determine the amount of time needed for this purpose, based upon the information provided to him or her at the time of inspection. 

The certificate issued pursuant to this section shall only be valid for transportation purposes during the period of time specified on the certificate by the inspector.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24123.

It is unlawful for any inspector to issue a certificate of inspection unless he or she personally makes the inspection between sunrise and sunset.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24124.

One copy of the certificate of inspection required by this chapter shall accompany the shipment of animals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24125.

Any person who transports an animal destined for slaughter who does not have a copy of the certificate of inspection as required pursuant to this chapter or who refuses, upon demand of any investigator of the program or any peace officer, to exhibit a copy of the certificate, is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed fifty dollars ($50) for each animal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24126.

It is unlawful for any person to remove any animal and substitute another for it, or to add any other animal or transport an animal from any lot of animals for which a certificate has been issued, until the shipment or slaughter is completed, unless the inspector who issued the certificate approves these actions in writing. A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24127.

(a) Each dealer who handles animals destined for slaughter, and who ships 15 or more animals at a time for slaughter, shall pay the inspector a service fee of twenty-five dollars ($25), in addition to a fee of up to ten dollars ($10) for each animal, as determined by the director. The inspection shall take place within 24 hours of the date of transportation.

(b) Each dealer who handles animals destined for slaughter, and who ships less than 15 animals at a time for slaughter, shall pay the inspector for the actual cost of the inspection, as determined by the director. The inspection shall take place immediately prior to when the animal to be shipped is loaded onto the conveyance.

(c) The fees shall be paid at the point of inspection of the animals. The revenue derived from these fees shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be expended to carry out this chapter. The department shall maintain all internal accounting measures necessary to ensure that revenue derived pursuant to this chapter shall be kept separate from all other funds in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund. The Governor’s budget submitted to the Legislature pursuant to Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution shall display the fiscal information for this program in accordance with Sections 13335, 13336, and 13337 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 593, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24128.

(a) The inspector shall make a memorandum which shows the number, sex, breed, color, approximate height and weight, approximate age, natural marks and identifying scars, and a description of each brand or tattoo and its location on each animal which is inspected, and the names of the owner or claimant, consignor, or consignee. 

(b) The memorandum of the inspection shall be retained for record purposes by the inspector for at least two years after the date of the inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24129.

The department shall maintain inspection certificates for a period of five years in a manner that shall disclose the number of animals that have been inspected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24130.

Any person that is engaged in the business of buying or selling animals on consignment at any public or private salesyard shall keep after each sale, a certificate of consignment which contains all of the following information:

(a) The name and address of the consignor. 

(b) A description of each animal which is sold that includes its sex, breed, color, approximate height and weight, approximate age, natural marks and identifying scars, and a description of each brand or tattoo and its location on each animal. 

(c) Reasonable proof of the ownership of the animal. 

(d) The license number of any vehicle which transports the animal to the salesyard. If the animal is transported in a trailer, the license number of both the trailer and the vehicle which pulls it shall be given. 

(e) The signature of the consignor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24131.

Any person subject to Section 24130 shall retain the certificate of consignment on file for a period of at least two years after the sale. The certificates of consignment shall be presented on demand of any peace officer or any agent of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24132.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person is civilly liable for four times the value of the animal at the time of taking, possessing, harboring, transporting, or slaughtering of the animal, with interest, at the prime rate from the date of that occurrence, for attorney fees incurred in the recovery of the animal, and for an amount in fair compensation for the time and money properly expended by the owner in pursuit of the animal, as follows: 

(1) In any action for the wrongful taking, possessing, harboring, or transporting of an animal for slaughter or for the slaughter of the animal without the consent of the owner or the person lawfully in possession of the animal or any animal whose ownership is still in dispute. 

(2) In any action where a person knowingly, by any false representation or pretense, defrauds another person of any animal, which results in the wrongful taking, possessing, harboring, or transporting of the animal for slaughter without the consent of the owner or the person lawfully in possession of the animal or any animal whose ownership is still in dispute. 

(b) The commencement of any criminal prosecution for the theft of the animal shall not preclude or prevent any civil action as specified in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24133.

Any person who transports an animal destined for slaughter out of the state under false pretenses in order to avoid an inspection under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) for each animal so transported.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24134.

Any person who falsifies any document or record required by this chapter, or by any regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter, is liable civilly for a penalty in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation. Any money that is recovered pursuant to this section shall be paid into the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be expended to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 217, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12. POULTRY, RABBITS, EGGS, AND EGG PRODUCTS [24501. - 27690.]



PART 1. POULTRY AND RABBITS [24501. - 25151.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [24501. - 24563.]



  ARTICLE 1. Application [24501. - 24502.]

24501.

The provisions of this part, including the payment of fees, are applicable to all state and county institutions which are engaging in livestock operations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24502.

The provisions of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 24501), 2 (commencing with Section 24651), and 3 (commencing with Section 24951), of Part 1 of Division 12 are not applicable to any poultry plant, or poultry product subject to requirements of plant sanitation and poultry meat product wholesomeness as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18651) of Part 3 of Division 9.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Investigations [24521. - 24521.]

24521.

The director may make any necessary investigations relative to reported violations of this part, pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180), Chapter 2, Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Civil Remedies [24541. - 24541.]

24541.

The Attorney General shall, upon complaint by the director, or may upon his own initiative, if after examination of the complaint and evidence he believes a violation of any provision of this part has occurred, bring an action in the name of the people of this state in the superior court for an injunction against any person violating any provision of this part or regulation which is duly issued by the director pursuant to it.

Any proceedings pursuant to this section shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525), Title 7, Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The director shall not, however, be required to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of adequate remedy at law or to show or tending to show irreparable damage or loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Poultry Regulations and Inspections [24561. - 24563.]

24561.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the director may adopt by regulation standards and requirements equal to those of the Poultry Products Inspection Act (71 Stat. 441, 21 U.S.C. 451, et seq. as amended by the Wholesome Poultry Products Act, Pub. Law 90-492), including, but not limited to, standards and requirements of inspection, sanitation, reinspection, preparation, processing, buying, selling, transporting, storing, identification, recordkeeping, registration, and labeling. The regulations shall not be less restrictive than state statutory requirements. The director may enter into cooperative agreements with departments, divisions, bureaus, boards, or commissions of the United States to enforce such standards and requirements in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1403.)
-------------------------------------------

24562.

Regulations adopted pursuant to this article or pursuant to Section 24681 or Section 24991 shall conform, so far as practicable, to the rules, regulations and standards of the United States Department of Agriculture which govern the inspection, preparation, and processing of poultry meat and poultry meat food products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1403.)
-------------------------------------------

24563.

(a) If slaughtering or carcass preparation or processing of poultry meats and poultry meat products is conducted in an establishment where state inspection is maintained at hours considered overtime for state employees or on legal holidays, the owner or operator of the establishment shall, by contract or agreement with the department, make arrangement to defray the additional cost for salaries and expenses for persons employed by the department to conduct the necessary poultry meat inspection work during the overtime periods.

(b) Moneys collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 31.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Plant Sanitation [24651. - 24831.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [24651. - 24661.]

24651.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24652.

“Fowl” includes chickens, turkeys, ducks, geese, and other domesticated birds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24653.

“Growing poultry” means feeding and caring for poultry.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24654.

“Marked” means plainly, legibly, and conspicuously labeled, stamped, tagged, stenciled, or branded to show the name and address of the poultry plant where, or the name and address of the distributor in California for whom, the poultry meat was slaughtered, prepared, packed, or repacked, cut up or recut, or handled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24655.

“Mislabel” means the placing, or presence of any false, deceptive, or misleading mark, tag, brand, design, inscription, statement, billing, invoice, placard, sign, or other descriptive designation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24656.

“New York dressed fowl” means fowl from which the feathers have been removed and the blood drawn and which is offered for sale as a whole fowl, with the head, feet, and entrails intact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24657.

“Poultry” means domesticated fowl and domesticated rabbit which are intended for use for human food.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24658.

“Poultry meat” means the carcass of poultry or any part of such carcass.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24659.

“Poultry plant” means any of the following:

(a) Any place where poultry is slaughtered, dressed, or drawn.

(b) Any place, except a retail store or eating place, where poultry meat or poultry meat food products are cooked, cured, smoked, cut up, recut, packed, or repacked, or otherwise prepared for human food.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24660.

“Producer” means any person that is engaged in the business of growing any poultry, which is marketed as poultry meat, for a period of three weeks or more for the purpose of increasing the size and weight of such poultry.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24661.

“Sanitary” means free from unnecessary dirt, filth, and contamination and free from any other substance or organism which is known to be injurious to human health.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [24681. - 24685.]

24681.

The director shall adopt regulations for carrying out this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24682.

No regulation which requires alterations in poultry plants or changes in equipment shall be effective until six months after the date on which the director gives notice to the persons that are licensed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24683.

The director shall furnish to each person that holds a license, or makes application for a license, a copy of the regulations which are adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24684.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation or threatened violation of this chapter or any regulation which is adopted pursuant to it in the superior court in and for the county in which the violation occurred or is about to occur.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24685.

Any proceeding pursuant to Section 24684 shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525), Title 7, Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The director shall not, however, be required to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of adequate remedy at law or to show or tending to show irreparable damage or loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exemptions [24711. - 24714.]

24711.

This chapter does not apply to a poultry plant which is operated under the sanitary regulations of the Consumer and Marketing Service of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24712.

This chapter does not apply to poultry meat which bears the official mark of a city, county, or state poultry plant inspection service for sanitation outside of the state which has requirements equal to those which are provided for by this chapter if such out-of-state requirements have been approved by the director. If, however, any packing, repacking, or cutting up or recutting is done, except in a retail store or public eating house, in this state it shall be done in a poultry plant which is licensed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24713.

(a) This chapter does not apply to a poultry plant where poultry which was produced on the premises is slaughtered if the poultry meat which is derived from the poultry is sold by the producer in any of the following ways:

(1) At retail upon the premises.

(2) At retail off of the premises, either direct to consumers at their homes or at a retail stand which is operated by the producer in a farmers’ market.

(b) As used in this section, “producer” includes only an individual producer who does not employ, except in unforeseeable exigencies, any person except members of his or her immediate family.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 535, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

24714.
